Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-103
Restrictions on applicability.

(1) The provisions of this code shall not apply to any offense committed prior to January 1, 1979. Such an offense shall be construed and punished according to the provisions of law existing at the time of the commission thereof in the same manner as if this code had not been enacted.

(2) For the purposes of this section, an offense shall be deemed to have been committed prior to January 1, 1979, if any element of the offense occurred prior thereto.

(3) This code shall not bar, suspend or otherwise affect any right or liability to damages, penalty, forfeiture or other remedy authorized by law to be recovered or enforced in a civil action.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 3.